Hawaii statutes.
[§124A-113] Accessory after the fact.
Any person subject to this chapter who, knowing that an offense punishable by
this chapter has been committed, receives, comforts, or assists the offender in
order to hinder or prevent the offender's apprehension, trial, or punishment
shall be punished as a court-martial may direct. [L 1982, c 171, pt of §2; gen
ch 1985]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next